Texas statutes.
FAMILY CODE

TITLE 4. PROTECTIVE ORDERS AND FAMILY VIOLENCE

SUBTITLE C. FAMILY VIOLENCE REPORTING AND SERVICES

CHAPTER 91. REPORTING FAMILY VIOLENCE

Sec. 91.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subtitle:

(1) "Family violence" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.004.

(2) "Medical professional" means a licensed doctor, nurse, physician assistant, or emergency medical technician.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 34, Sec. 1, eff. May 5, 1997.

Sec. 91.002. REPORTING BY WITNESSES ENCOURAGED. A person who witnesses family violence is encouraged to report the family violence to a local law enforcement agency.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 34, Sec. 1, eff. May 5, 1997.

Sec. 91.003. INFORMATION PROVIDED BY MEDICAL PROFESSIONALS. A medical professional who treats a person for injuries that the medical professional has reason to believe were caused by family violence shall:

(1) immediately provide the person with information regarding the nearest family violence shelter center;

(2) document in the person's medical file:

(A) the fact that the person has received the information provided under Subdivision (1); and

(B) the reasons for the medical professional's belief that the person's injuries were caused by family violence; and

(3) give the person the written notice adopted by the Health and Human Services Commission under Section 51A.003, Human Resources Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 34, Sec. 1, eff. May 5, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 1325), Sec. 6, eff. May 13, 2023.

Sec. 91.004. APPLICATION OF SUBTITLE. This subtitle does not affect a duty to report child abuse under Chapter 261.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 34, Sec. 1, eff. May 5, 1997.